Washington statutes.
RCW 9.16.080

Petroleum products improperly labeled or graded—Penalty.

(1) It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation:

(a) To use, adopt, place upon, or permit to be used, adopted or placed upon, any barrel, tank, drum or other container of gasoline or lubricating oil for internal combustion engines, sold or offered for sale, or upon any pump or other device used in delivering the same, any trade name, trademark, designation or other descriptive matter, which is not the true and correct trade name, trademark, designation or other descriptive matter of the gasoline or lubricating oil so sold or offered for sale;

(b) To sell, or offer for sale, or have in his or her or its possession with intent to sell, any gasoline or lubricating oil, contained in, or taken from, or through any barrel, tank, drum, or other container or pump or other device, so unlawfully labeled or marked, as hereinabove provided;

(c) To sell, or offer for sale, or have in his or her or its possession with intent to sell any gasoline or lubricating oil for internal combustion engines and to represent to the purchaser, or prospective purchaser, that such gasoline or lubricating oil so sold or offered for sale, is of a quality, grade or standard, or the product of a particular gasoline or lubricating oil manufacturing, refining or distributing company or association, other than the true quality, grade, standard, or the product of a particular gasoline or oil manufacturing, refining or distributing company or association, of the gasoline or oil so offered for sale or sold.

(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, any person, firm, or corporation violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) A second and each subsequent violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2003 c 53 s 14; 1927 c 222 s 1; RRS s 2637-1.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.